Tennessee, session 114, SB1881.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 10-7-504(a)(2)(A), is amended by
adding the language "the office of homeland security," after the language "All investigative
records of the Tennessee bureau of investigation,".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 10-7-504(a)(2), is amended by
adding the following new subdivision:
( ) The following records of the office of homeland security must be treated as
confidential and are not open to inspection by members of the public:
(i) All records possessed by the office describing protected critical
infrastructure submitted or created for protected use regarding the security of
critical infrastructure or protected systems, analyses, warnings, interdependency
studies, recovery, reconstitution, or for other appropriate purposes;
(ii) All records relating to the identification, analysis, prevention,
preemption, disruption, response, maintenance, and defense against and
mitigation of terrorist or criminal threats and acts against Tennessee's critical
infrastructure and the homeland; and
(iii) All records that are designated by the commissioner of safety or the
commissioner's designee as describing or relating to protected critical
infrastructure.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1881
010044
- 1 -